Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1906
Road construction or improvement; special levy; limit; bonds.

Any township or precinct may make a special levy, not exceeding three and five-tenths cents on each one hundred dollars upon the taxable value of all the taxable property in such township or precinct, to improve, to construct, or to aid in the improvement or construction of a road. For the same purpose, any township or precinct may issue bonds by proceeding in the manner prescribed in sections 39-836 to 39-842.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. VI, § 6, p. 560;

Laws 1959, c. 167, § 8, p. 612;

Laws 1971, LB 992, § 1;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 167;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 147.